en: Pound Cake
de: Rührkuchen
es: Bizcocho
fr: Quatre-quarts, quatre-quart, Barre pâtissière
hr: Pound cake
ja: パウンドケーキ
nl: Pondscake

en: Apple Cakes
fr: Gâteaux aux pommes, Quatre-quarts aux pommes
zh: 苹果蛋糕

en: Frozen apple cakes
fr: Gâteaux aux pommes surgelés, Quatre-quarts aux pommes surgelés

en: Dorayaki
xx: Dorayaki
de: Dorayaki
es: Dorayaki
fr: Dorayaki
hr: Dorayaki
it: Dorayaki
ja: どら焼き, 銅鑼焼き, どらやき
nl: Dorayaki

en: Nut rolls
ar: لفائف الجوز
hr: Orahnjača
jv: Kacang gulung
mk: Оревњача
uk: Горіховий рулет

en: Makowiec
xx: Makowiec
hr: Makovnjača
sk: Makovník
sr: Маковњача
uk: Маківник

en: Snacks
bg: Закуски
ca: Snacks
cs: Svačiny
da: Snacks
de: Imbiss, Snack
es: Botanas, Snacks
fi: Naposteltavat
fr: Snacks
he: חטיפים
hr: Grickalice
hu: Snackek
it: Snack
lt: Užkandžiai
nl: Snacks
no: Snacks
pl: Przekąski
pt: Lanches comida
ro: Gustări
ru: Закуски
sv: Snacks, Tilltugg
th: ขนม-ของว่าง
tr: Atıştırmalıklar
zh: 零食

en: Snacks variety packs
bg: Варианти на закуски
ca: Assortiments de snacks
cs: Variety packy svačin
da: Snacks variationer
de: Snack-Vielfaltspackungen, Snacks Mischpackungen
es: Variedades de snacks, Paquetes variados de aperitivos
fi: Snacksien monipakkaukset
fr: Assortiments de snacks, Assortiments d'amuse-gueules
he: אריזות מגוון חטיפים
hr: Raznovrsna pakiranja grickalica
hu: Snack választék csomagok
it: Assortimenti di snack, Confezioni miste di snacks
lt: Užkandžių įvairovės rinkiniai
nl: Snacks variatiepakketten, Snackassortimenten
pl: Wielopaki przekąsek
pt: Variedades de snacks, Packs variados de aperitivos
ro: Asortimente de gustări
ru: Варианты закусок
sv: Snacks variationer

en: Flavoured pistachios, flavored pistachios
fr: Pistaches aromatisées
nl: Gearomatiseerde pistachenoten, Pistachenoten (gearomatiseerd)

en: Sweet snacks, Sugary snacks
bg: Сладки закуски
ca: Aperitius dolços
cs: Sladké svačiny
da: Søde snacks
de: Süßer Snack
es: Snacks dulces
fi: Makeat naposteltavat
fr: Snacks sucrés, sucreries
he: חטיפים מתוקים, חטיפים ממותקים
hr: Slatki zalogaji
hu: Cukros ételek
it: Snack dolci
lt: Saldūs užkandžiai, Užkandžiai su cukrumi
nl: Zoete snacks
pl: Słodkie przekąski
pt: Lanches doces, lanches açucarados
ro: Gustări dulci
ru: Сладкие закуски
sv: Söta snacks, Söta tilltugg
zh: 含糖零食

en: Confectioneries, confectionary, confectionery
ca: Llaminadures
da: Konfekture
de: Süßwaren, Süßigkeiten, Konfekt, Konditorwaren
es: Dulces
fi: Sokerileipomotuotteet
fr: Confiseries, confiserie
he: מתוקים, דברי מתיקה
hr: Konditorski proizvodi
hu: Cukrász áruk
it: Dolci, dolce
lt: Saldumynai
nl: Zoetwaren, Confiserie, Suikerwerk
pl: Cukiernie
pt: Confeitaria
ru: Кондитерские изделия
sv: Konfekt
th: ขนมหวาน
zh: 糖果及甜食

xx: Bánh đậu xanh, Banh dau xanh
en: Bánh đậu xanh, Banh dau xanh

xx: Laddu, ladoo
en: Laddu, ladoo

xx: Besan Laddu, besan ladoo
en: Besan Laddu, besan ladoo

xx: Chikki
en: Chikki

xx: Gulab jamun
en: Gulab jamun

xx: Soan papdi
en: Soan papdi

en: Fudge
bg: Фъдж

en: Chocolate alternatives without cocoa
fr: Alternatives au chocolat sans cacao

en: Bonbon alternatives without cocoa
fr: Alternatives aux bonbons de chocolat sans cacao